Maryland, session 2026, HB0081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–109.
(a) At the commencement of a traffic stop or other stop, absent exigent
circumstances, a police officer shall:
(1) display proper identification to the stopped individual; and
(2) provide the following information to the stopped individual:
(i) the officer’s name;
(ii) the officer’s identification number issued by the law enforcement
agency the officer is representing;
(iii) the name of the law enforcement agency the police officer is
representing; and
(iv) the reason for the traffic stop or other stop.
(b) A POLICE OFFICER SHALL DOCUMENT ALL REASONS FOR A TRAFFIC
STOP OR OTHER STOP ON ANY CITATION OR POLICE REPORT RESULTING FROM THE
STOP.
(C) A police officer’s failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section:
(1) may be grounds for administrative disciplinary action against the
officer; and
(2) may [not] serve as the basis for the exclusion of evidence under the
exclusionary rule.
[(c)] (D) A police officer may not prohibit or prevent a citizen from recording the
police officer’s actions if the citizen is otherwise acting lawfully and safely.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–401.

HOUSE BILL 81 3
(a) This section applies to any vehicle required to be registered under this title.
(b) (1) If a vehicle is not registered, a person may not drive the vehicle on a
highway in this State.
(2) (i) If a person is convicted of a violation of this subsection that
involved the use of an off–highway recreational vehicle on a highway, the court shall notify
the Administration of the violation.
(ii) The Chief Judge of the District Court, in conjunction with the
Administration, shall establish uniform procedures for reporting convictions described in
this paragraph.
(c) If a vehicle is not registered, the owner of the vehicle may not knowingly allow
the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
(d) (1) If the required registration fee for a vehicle has not been paid, a person
may not drive the vehicle on a highway in this State.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(e) (1) If the required registration fee for a vehicle has not been paid, the owner
of the vehicle may not knowingly allow the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(f) If the registration of a vehicle is canceled, a person may not drive the vehicle
on a highway in this State.
(g) If the registration of a vehicle is canceled, the owner of the vehicle may not
knowingly allow the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
(h) If the registration of a vehicle is suspended, a person may not drive the vehicle
on a highway in this State.
(i) If the registration of a vehicle is suspended, the owner of the vehicle may not
knowingly allow the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
(j) If the registration of a vehicle is revoked, a person may not drive the vehicle
on a highway in this State.

HOUSE BILL 81
(k) If the registration of a vehicle is revoked, the owner of the vehicle may not
knowingly allow the vehicle to be driven on a highway in this State.
13–411.
(a) On a vehicle for which two registration plates are required, one plate shall be
attached on the front and the other on the rear of the vehicle.
(b) On a vehicle for which one registration plate is required, the plate shall be
attached on the:
(1) Front of the vehicle for a Class F (tractor) vehicle; and
(2) Rear of the vehicle for every other vehicle.
(c) (1) At all times, each registration plate shall be:
(i) Maintained free from foreign materials, including registration
plate covers as defined in § 13–411.1 of this subtitle, and in a condition to be clearly legible;
and
(ii) Securely fastened to the vehicle for which it is issued:
1. In a horizontal position;
2. In a manner that prevents the plate from swinging; and
3. In a place and position to be clearly visible.
(2) For a violation involving the placement of an object framing or
bordering the edges of a registration plate, a police officer may enforce this subsection only
as a secondary action when the police officer detains a driver of a motor vehicle for a
suspected violation of another provision of the Code.
(d) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law, as to
any vehicle required to be registered under this title, a person may not drive the vehicle on
any highway in this State, unless there is attached to the vehicle and displayed on it, as
required in this title:
(1) A registration plate or plates issued for the vehicle by the
Administration for the current registration period; and
(2) Any validation tab issued for the vehicle under this subtitle.
(e) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law, as to
any vehicle required to be registered under this title, the owner of the vehicle may not

HOUSE BILL 81 5
permit the vehicle to be driven on any highway in this State, unless there is attached to
and displayed on the vehicle, as required in this title:
(1) A registration plate or plates issued by the Administration for the
current registration period; and
(2) Any validation tab issued for the vehicle under this subtitle.
(f) (1) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law,
a vehicle used or driven in this State may not display on either its front or rear any expired
registration plate issued by any state.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(g) Except as otherwise expressly permitted by the Maryland Vehicle Law, a
person may not display or permit to be displayed on any vehicle used or driven in this State
any registration plate issued for another vehicle or to a person other than the owner of the
vehicle.
(h) (1) A vehicle registered as a historic or antique vehicle (Class L) in this
State or in another state, when used or driven in this State, may display vintage
registration plates as an indication of the historic or antique nature of the vehicle. Except
as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the place on the vehicle provided for the
display of registration plates may only be used for the display of current registration plates
in accordance with subsections (a) through (c) of this section, and any vintage registration
plates which are used shall be displayed elsewhere on the vehicle.
(2) If the Administration authorizes the display of vintage registration
plates in lieu of current registration plates, as provided in § 13–936.1 of this title, the
vintage registration plates shall be displayed as required under subsections (a) through (c)
of this section. However, the current registration plates shall be kept in the vehicle at all
times.
(i) It is the duty of every police officer to report to the Administration all vehicles
operated in violation of this section. The Administration shall verify whether the owner of
a reported vehicle has complied with this section.
(J) A POLICE OFFICER MAY NOT STOP A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR DISPLAYING
AN EXPIRED REGISTRATION BEFORE THE FIRST DAY OF THE FOURTH MONTH
FOLLOWING THE ORIGINAL EXPIRATION DATE OF THE REGISTRATION.
13–701.

HOUSE BILL 81
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, as to any vehicle required to be
registered under this title, a person may not drive the vehicle on any highway in this State,
unless the vehicle displays current registration plates and a current registration card is
carried as required in this title.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title, as to any vehicle required to be
registered under this title, an owner of the vehicle may not knowingly permit the vehicle to
be driven on a highway in this State, unless the vehicle displays current registration plates
and a current registration card is carried as required in this title.
(C) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER MAY NOT STOP A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR
DISPLAYING AN EXPIRED REGISTRATION BEFORE THE FIRST DAY OF THE FOURTH
MONTH FOLLOWING THE ORIGINAL EXPIRATION DATE OF THE REGISTRATION.
21–1111.
(a) A person may not drop, throw, or place on a highway any glass bottle, glass,
nails, tacks, wire, cans, or any other substance likely to injure any person, animal, or
vehicle on the highway.
(b) Any person who drops, throws, or places or permits to be dropped, thrown, or
placed on a highway any destructive, hazardous, or injurious material immediately shall
remove it or cause it to be removed.
(c) Any person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway also shall
remove from the highway any glass or other injurious substance dropped from the vehicle.
(d) A person may not throw, dump, discharge, or deposit any trash, junk, or other
refuse on any highway or public bridge or in any public waters.
(e) The owner of the vehicle, if present in the vehicle, or, in his absence, the driver
of the vehicle is presumed to be responsible for any violation of this section, if:
(1) The violation is caused by an occupant of the vehicle;
(2) The vehicle has two or more occupants; and
(3) It cannot be determined which occupant is the violator.
(f) A violation of this section is considered a moving violation for purposes of §
16–402 of this article.

HOUSE BILL 81 7
(G) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A SECONDARY
ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR
A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
22–203.
(b) (1) Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, shall be equipped with at
least two headlamps with at least one on each side of the front of the motor vehicle, which
headlamps shall emit white light and comply with the requirements and limitations set
forth in this title.
(2) IF A MOTOR VEHICLE, OTHER THAN A MOTORCYCLE, HAS AT
LEAST ONE WORKING HEADLAMP ON THE FRONT OF THE VEHICLE THAT EMITS
WHITE LIGHT AND COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS AND LIMITATIONS SET
FORTH IN THIS TITLE, A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY AS
A SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE
CODE.
22–204.
(f) (1) Either a tail lamp or a separate lamp shall be constructed and placed
to illuminate, with a white light, the rear registration plate and render it clearly legible
from a distance of 50 feet to the rear. Any tail lamp or tail lamps, together with any separate
lamp or lamps for illuminating the rear registration plate, shall be wired to be lighted
whenever the head lamps or auxiliary driving lamps are lighted.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
22–403.
(a) Every motor vehicle shall be equipped with at least one mirror located to
reflect to the driver a view of the highway for a distance of at least 200 feet to the rear of
the vehicle.
(b) Every motor vehicle registered in this State shall be equipped with an outside
mirror on the driver’s side located to reflect to the driver a view of the highway for a distance
of at least 200 feet to the rear of the vehicle and along the driver’s side of the vehicle. This
subsection does not apply to motorcycles, which are governed by subsection (c) of this
section.
(c) Every motorcycle shall be equipped with two rearview mirrors, one each
attached to the right and left handlebars, which shall meet applicable federal motor vehicle
safety standards.

HOUSE BILL 81
(d) (1) Where the view through the inside rearview mirror is obstructed, two
outside rearview mirrors are required.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
22–406.
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a person may
not operate a vehicle registered under § 13–912, § 13–913, § 13–917, or § 13–937 of this
article on a highway in this State if:
(i) In the case of a vehicle registered under § 13–912 of this article,
there is affixed to any window of the vehicle any tinting materials added to the window
after manufacture of the vehicle that do not allow a light transmittance through the window
of at least 35%; and
(ii) In the case of a vehicle registered under § 13–913, § 13–917, or §
13–937 of this article, there is affixed to any window to the immediate right or left of the
driver any window tinting materials added after manufacture of the vehicle that do not
allow a light transmittance through the window of at least 35%.
(2) If a police officer observes that a vehicle is being operated in violation
of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the officer may [stop the driver of the vehicle and, in
addition to]:
(I) ENFORCE PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE; AND
(II) 1. ISSUE a citation charging the driver with the offense[,
issue]; OR
2. ISSUE to the driver a safety equipment repair order in
accordance with the provisions of § 23–105 of this article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
construed to apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any
proceedings not finally adjudicated on the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.